Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.015

Conditions to award. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

(1) The court may not make an award to a claimant under this chapter until the expenses of administration, funeral expenses, expenses of last sickness, and wages due for labor performed within 60 days immediately preceding the decedent's death have been paid or provided for.

(2) The court may not make an award to or for the benefit of any person who is a slayer or abuser as those terms are defined in RCW 11.84.010 of the decedent.

(3) The court may not make any award under this chapter unless the petition for the award is filed before the earliest of:

(a) Eighteen months from the date of the decedent's death if within 12 months of the decedent's death either:

(i) A personal representative has been appointed; or

(ii) A notice agent has filed a declaration and oath as required in RCW 11.42.010(3)(a)(ii); or

(b) The termination of all proceedings under this title relating to the decedent's probate or nonprobate assets; or

(c) Six years from the date of the death of the decedent.

[ 2024 c 20 s 5; 2008 c 6 s 918; 1997 c 252 s 50. Formerly RCW 11.54.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—2024 c 20: See notes following RCW 11.54.001.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.